Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.180

Foreclosed property—Sale or lease—Disposition of proceeds.

Any county may at any time after a deed is issued to it under and by virtue of any proceeding mentioned in this chapter, lease or sell or convey any such property at public or private sale for such price and on such terms as may be determined by resolution of the board, and all proceeds resulting from such sale shall ratably belong to and be paid into the fund of the county road improvement district or districts concerned after first reimbursing any fund or funds having advanced any money on account of said property.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.180. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 18.]